Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-203
County seat; location; designation on ballot.

At such election, provided for by section 22-202, the voters of the county shall determine the permanent location of the county seat. For this purpose each voter may designate on his ballot the place of his choice for the county seat, and when the votes are canvassed, the place having a majority of all the votes polled shall be the county seat, and public notice of the location shall be given by the county board within thirty days, by posting up notices in three several places in each precinct in the county, and a copy of such notice shall be recorded by the county clerk in the book of miscellaneous records.

G.S.1873, c. 12, § 81, p. 229;

R.S.1913, § 914;

C.S.1922, § 820;

C.S.1929, § 25-203;

R.S.1943, § 22-203.